Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1050
Primary place of use, defined.

Primary place of use means the residential or business street address that is representative of the primary location of the customer's use of a service that includes the provision of 911 service.

Laws 2007, LB661, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-429.01;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 32.